Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3418
Applicant; certification required.

Except as provided in section
38-3420, an applicant for licensure as a genetic counselor shall provide satisfactory
evidence that he or she is certified as a genetic counselor by either the
national genetic counseling board or the national medical genetics board.

Laws 2012, LB831, § 18.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.